hyph-utf8/tex/generic/hyph-utf8/patterns/hyph-de-1996.tex
\patterns{%
.a6
.ab3b
.aben2
.ab5l
.abo4
.ab3ol
.ab1or
.ab5r
.ab3s
.ag4r
.ag2u
.aid2
.ai2s
.al3br
.al2e
.al3l4en
.al3ph
.al4tei
.alt3s
.amt4
.amt6s3
.an3alg
.an3d
.ang4
.an1gl
.angs4
.angst3
.an3k
.an3s
.an4si.
.ans2p
.an3z
.ap3s2
.ar3k2a
.ar4m3ac
.ar4s
.ar4t3ei
.as1t
.as4ta
.au3d
.au2f5
.au4s1
.ausch3
.aus5s
.ä4
.äm5
.ät2s
.b6
.bau1s
.be3erb
.bei6ge.
.be3ra
.be3r2e
.ber4g3a
.ber4g3r
.bi4os
.boge2
.bo4s3k
.c4
.ch2
.con3
.d4
.dab6
.da2r1
.dar3in
.dar2m
.da4te.
.da4tes
.de4al
.de1i
.de3o2
.de3r4en
.de1s
.de3sk
.de3s2t
.deut2
.dien4
.do3b
.do2mo
.do1pe
.dor2f1
.dü1b
.e4
.ebe2
.ehe3i
.ei3e2
.ei4ne
.ei5nen.
.ei5ner
.ei5nes
.ei4sp
.ei4st
.ei2tr
.el2bi
.elb3s
.els7t
.em3m2
.en1
.en4d3er
.en4d3r
.enn2
.en4t3
.er4dei
.er4der
.er1e
.er1i
.er8stein
.es3k
.es3p
.es1ta
.es5t4e
.es1th
.es3tr
.et4s
.eu3
.eug4
.ext4
.f6
.fi3est
.fi4le.
.fi4len
.fin6s
.fi2s
.frau3
.fs4
.fu2sc
.g4
.ga4t
.gd2
.gel2d
.ge5nar
.ge3ne
.ge3r2a
.ge3r2e
.ge3s4a
.ge1u
.gros4
.gs2
.gus4s3
.gu4ter
.h4
.ha3bi
.haft5s
.hal5te
.haup4
.hau4t1
.he2
.he3cke
.he3ri
.he6r5inn
.he5xe
.his1
.ho4met
.i6
.ia4
.im2a
.in3
.ink4
.inu3
.is2a
.is3tr
.jor5
.k6
.ka2b5l
.ka2i
.kamp2
.ka6t3io
.ki4e
.klan4
.ks2
.kü1b
.l4
.la3b
.le4a
.le5ni
.lib6
.lo4g3in
.lo3ver
.m4
.ma3d
.ma3ge
.ma3le
.ma4st
.me3l4a
.me3ne
.men8schw
.ment2
.mi2s
.mi4t
.n4
.näs3c
.ne6s
.nich2
.ni4e
.nob4
.no2th
.nus4
.o6
.oa3
.ob1a
.obe2
.oben3
.ober3i
.ob3l
.oper4
.or2a
.ort2
.ort6s
.orts3e
.oste2
.os4tel
.os8t7ende
.oste6r5e
.ost3r
.ozo4
.ö6
.p6
.pa6r1e
.par3t4h
.pat4s
.pe5la
.pf6
.ph4
.poka2
.po4st
.ps2
.r6
.reb3s2
.re3cha
.rein4t
.reli1
.reli3e
.res4tr
.rich5t6e
.ro3be
.ro2h
.ro3m2a
.rö4s
.rös3c
.rut2
.ru3th
.rü1b
.rü6cker
.s6
.sali3e
.sch4
.sen5s
.ser2u
.se2t
.sha2
.si2e
.sim3p4
.si4te
.ski1e
.spra2
.st6
.sto4re
.t6
.ta5ge4s
.ta3mi
.tan6k5l
.ta2to
.te2e
.tehe3
.te3no
.te4st
.th4
.ti4a
.ti2s
.ti3ta
.to2n
.to4ni
.ton3s
.to4pl
.to4st
.to2w
.tri3es
.ts2
.tu3ra
.tu3ri
.u6
.uf2e2
.ul4mei
.um3
.umo2
.un3a2
.un3d
.un3e
.unen2
.un3g
.uni4t
.un3s
.un5s4t
.ur1
.urin4
.ur5o2m
.uro2p
.ur3s2
.ut2a
.ut3r
.ü2
.v2
.ve5n2e
.ve4r
.vol2
.vo4r
.w2
.wah2
.wah4l
.wa3re
.we2
.weg3
.welt3
.wi4e
.wor2
.wor6t5en
.wor4tu
.wun4sc
.x4
.xe3
.y4
.ya4l
.z2
.zah2n
.za4s
.zi2e
.zin6s5t
.zuch2
.zwe4
6a.
4aa
a1ab
aa2be
aa1c
aa2gr
aale5ne
aa4lö
a1a2n
aa2r1a
aa5re
aar3f4
aar3k4
aart4
aar3tr
aas3t
aat6s3
a3au
a1ä
2aba
ab2am
ab1ar
ab1auf
ab1ä
ab2äu
1abd
a1be
ab1eb
abe1e
abei3
ab1eil
4a3bel
abe2la
abe4na
2aber
a3beri
ab1erk
ab1err
ab1erz
ab3esse
4abet
2abew
1abf
3abfi
1abg
1abh
2abi
ab1ins
ab1ir
ab1iso
ab1it
1abk
ab3l
1a2b5la
3a2b5lä
2able
ab4le.
ab5li
a3blis
3a2b5lö
a2blu
3abn
2abo
a2bo.
ab4of
3a2bon
ab3r
ab5rec
1abs
2abs.
abs2a
2absar
ab3s2i
ab3sp
abst6
2abst.
ab5sta
ab5ste
ab3sz
1abtei
2a1bu
ab3ur
2abü
ab3üb
1abw
2aby
1abz
2ac.
a2ce.
a1cem
ach1a
ach3ak
a1chal
ach3au
a1che
a2ch1e2c
ach1ei
a4cherf
ach3erw
a3ches
4achf
a1chi
a3chis
ach5l
ach5m
ach3n
a1cho
a3cho.
ach1o4b
ach1or
ach1ö
ach3r
ach3spr
ach3su
ach6t5erg
ach4th
ach2t1o
a1chu
ach1u2f
ach3ü
4achv
2ach3w
ac1in
2ack.
a1ckar
ack2en
a3cki
a4ckin
ack2se
ack3sl
ack5sta4
acon4n
2acu
a1ç
2a1d
4ad.
ada1b
a4d1ac
ad1ama
a2d1an
3a4d5ap
a3dar3
3a2dä
ade4al
adefi4
ad1ein
ade1ra
4ades
ade3s2p
ades6s
4adi
adi3en
ad2ob
ado3c
a2dr
ad5rah
4ad3rec
ad4res
ad5ru
ad1s2
ad3sä
ad3sp
ad3st
ad3sz
ad4t1
adt3a
2ae
a1e2b
a1e2c
a1e2d
a1ei
a1el.
a2ele
a2eli
a1els
a1em
ae2o3
a1e2p
ae1r
3a2er2o
a1e2s1
aes3t
a1e2x
a2f1a
a3fah
a3fal
af3an
a3f2ar
a3fat
2afe
a2f1ec
a2fent
af1erl
af4f5l
2a3fi
2af3l
af3ra
af3rä
af3re
af3rö
af3ru
af3s2a
af2sp
afs4t
af3ste
2aft
af2t1a
af3tab
af2tei
af4t3erl
af2t3r
af4t5re
af2tur
a2f1ur
a1g
2aga
ag1a2b
ag3a2d
ag1ar
ag1au
ag2d
a2gem
a5gen.
age4na
a2gent
age2nu
age2se
age4si
age4s3p
ages3s
a4g5esse
age4s3ti
ag3gl
2agi
3a2git
4a2g3l
ag4la
ag4lei
ag5lo
a4glö
ag1lu
ag4n
a4g5na
a5gnat
a2go
a3gob
a5gon.
a5gons
a3gor
a2g3re
a2g3ri
ag4ro
a3gru
2ags
agsa2
ag4sam
ag4set
ag6s5p
ag7spi
ag3sta
ag3ste
ags4tei
2agt
2agu
a2g1und
2ah.
2a1ha
ah4at
2a1he
a2h1erh
a1hi
ahl5a2
ahl1ei
ah4l3erh
ahl1o
ah4lö
ahl3sz
ah3ma
ah3me
ah4n3a
ahn5th
ah1os
a2h1ö
ahr1a
ah3re
ah4rei
ahre6s3
ah1ri
2ahs
aht3sp
a1hu
ah1w
a1hy
2ai
ai1a
aib3l
ai1er
aif2
ai3g4
a3ik.
ai3ku
a2il
ai2lo
a1ind
ai3n4e
a1ing
ain3sp
ai2nu
ai3o
ai2sa
a3isch.
ai5s2e
ais3s
a2it
a3iv.
a3ivl
a3ivs
a1j
aje4
2ak.
a2kad
2akam
2akar
ak4at
aka2ta
2akb
2akc
2akd
4a1ke
a2kef
a2kes
a2keu
2a1ki
2ak3l
ak4la
ak4li
ak3n
4ako
2a1kr
ak3rau
ak3res
2aks
ak3sh
2akta
ak3t2an
2aktb
ak5ten
2aktik
akt2o
ak4t5r
ak5t6ri
2aktst
2a1ku
a2kun
4a3kü
1akz
al1ab
a1lac
ala5ch
al1af
ala4g
al1age
a3l2al
a1lala
al3all
al1am
al5amp
al1ana
al1ang
al1ans
al3anz
a2lar
a3lar.
a3lare
a3lari
al2arm
al3arr
ala4s
al3asi
al3ass
al1au
al3aug
a1lä
al1äm
alb3ein
alb3eis
al4berh
al4b3erw
al2b3l
al2boh
al2br
alb3ru
alb3s
al2da
al2dä
al3dri
alds2
ald3st
al3du
2ale
3a2l1e2b
3a2l1ef
a4l1eh
a2l1ei
a4lein
a2l1el
al3ends
a2leng
al2ent
a2le2p
al1epo
4a5ler.
a2l1erf
a2l1erh
a2l1erl
a2l1ert
3a2lerz
a2l1esk
ale4t
al3eta
al3eth
a4l1eu
3alex
al1exi
al2gli
2ali
ali4e3ne
ali4nal
ali5ne
a2l1ins
a2linv
al2k1ar
1alkoh
alk3s4
al2lan
al2l3a6r
al2lau
al4lec
al3lend
all5erfa
al3les
alli5er.
alli7ers.
2alo
a2l1ob
alo2ga
al1ope
al1orc
al1ö
al2ös
3alpe.
1alph
al3skl
al3sp
al4spal
al5s6terb
al2ta
al3tam
alt3eig
al4te4l
al4t3erf
al2tö
al2tri
alt3ric
al2tro
alt4stü
3alty
a1lu
al2uf
a2lum
al1ur
4aly
am2a
amab4
ama5d
am4e
4ame.
a2meb
ame2n
amer2a
a2meri
a4mese
a5met
a2mew
a3mie
a3mil
2a3mir
amit2a
ami5ti
2ammal
am2min
ammu2
2amo
a2mö
2amp
amp2f3a2
am3pr
am2s
am3sa
am3so
am3sp
am3str
3amt.
am2t1a
am2t1ä
am4tel
am4t3ern
am2to
am2tö
am4t3r
am2tu
4amu
am3unt
4ana.
2anab
ana3c
a3na3d
anadi3
a3nak
2anan
an3ara
2anas2
2anat
an1äs
1anb
3anbr
an5cht
4and.
an5de6s
an2d1ex
2ando
an4d5rü
and4sas
an2d1ur
4ane
an3e4c
a3nee
an3eif
an1e2k
5a4n1erb
an3eth
1anfä
anft5s
4ang.
3angeb
an4g5ei
ang5erl
ang5erz
2angf
2angh
2angie
ang3l
an2gla
an2glä
ang5le.
2ango
ang3ra
4angs.
ang5sc
ang6s5po
1anh
4a3ni
ani3els
ani5ers.
5a4nim
4anj
2ank.
an2k1an
an3k4l
an4klö
an2k3no
an2k1r
ank3ra
ank3rä
ank5ti
an2ky
1anl
2anmu
2ann
3an3na
3annä
an5n4e
an3od
an1or
a1nö
1anr
2ans.
3ansä
1ansc
an5se
ans2en
an6seu
an3skr
an2s1pa
1anspr
an3s2t
an5stei
an5str
an3s2z
2ant.
ant2a
an2t3a4r
1antá
1antei
3antenn
an3th
ant2he
1anthr
2anto
1antr
an2tro
3antw
4a3nu
a4nunt
a5nus
a1nü
1anw
2anwet
2anz
3anzah
3anzei
anz5erst
an2z1i4n
3anzu
3anzü
an2zw
ao1i
a1op
a1or
a1o4s5
aot2
a3ot.
ao3ts
a1ö
a1p
2ap.
4apa
2ape
a2pé
ap2fa
a3pfl
a3phä
ap1hel
2a2p3l
ap2n
apo1s
a2pot
ap3pl
2apr
2apu
2ar.
2a1ra
a3ra.
ar2ab4
ar3abt
ara3d2
a2r3al
ar1ang
ar1ans
ar3anz
a2r3app
ara4st
a2r1au
a1rä
2arb.
4arba
ar2bau
ar2bec
arb3eie
arb3eim
2arben
2arbi
ar2b5l
2arbr
ar2bre
2arbs2
arb3sp
2arbt
2arbu
ar2b3un
ar1c
1archi
ar2dr
2are
4are.
a2rea
are5b
a2ref
ar1eff
a4re3g
ar1ehr
a2rein
a5ren
a2rena
a2rene
are3r2a
a3r2erf
a2r1erh
a2reri
are3u
ar2ew
2arf
ar2f1r
arf3ra
ar2gl
ar2gn
2arh
4a1ri
ar2ia
ari3e2n
arien3e
ari3erd
ari3erg
a2r1im
ar1ind
ar1ins
ar1int
a3riu
2ark
ark5amt
ar2k1ar
ark3aue
ar2kl
ark3lag
ar2kor
ark1r
ar4kri
arks2
ark3sa
ark3sh
ar4les
2arma
arm2ä
arm3erk
arm2or
2arn
ar5n2e
2a1ro
ar1ob
ar3o2d
a3rodo
a3rol
a2r1op
a2ror
2arp
ar5pr
2arr
4arr.
ar2r3ad
arre4n
ar2rh
arr3he
2ar2s
ar3sa
ar4schl
ar4schr
ar5se
ar3s2h
ars3k
ar3sta
ar3su
ar2tau
1artd
ar4t3erl
art2ho
artin2
2arto
ar2t3r
2arts
2a1ru
ar1ums
ar3ü
2arv
2ary
ar2zä
2arze
1arzn
1arzt
ar2z1w
2as
as2al
as3ala
a4s3au
a2s1ä
a6sca
a4schec
asch3la
a2schm
4as2e
a2seb
ase3le
aseli5
a2s3e2m
a3ses
4ash
a3s2hi
a5si.
4asis
a3skop
as1o2f
a3sol
a3som
as1or
a2s1ö
a2s1p
as3pan
as3pe
as2ph
as2po
as2pu
as3s2a
as5se
as6sei
asse3le
as3s2i
as5so
as2s1p
as2st
ass3ti
as4sto
as3str
a2st
4a4s1ta
a5s4tas
as2tau
a5stä
as3te
as3ti
4a3str
ast3rau
ast3rä
as4t3re
a2sü
3asy
a1ß
aße2
2a1t
4ata1
a2t1ab
ata2be
at2af
at4a5g
at1akt
a3tam
at1apf
a2t1au2
a3tau.
at1än
at2c
4a3te
a4teb
at1eig
a4teli
a4tep
ater3st
a4tew
4atf
4atg
at2he
5athl
a4thr
4a3ti
at1int
3atm
4atmus
ato4man
a2t1ort
a2t1ö
4atp
4atr
atra4t
at3rä
at3re
at3rom
at2s
at3sc
at4set
ats1p
3attac
att3ang
at2t1au
at2tei
at5thä
att3rau
at4t3rä
atts4
4atu
a3tub
atu4n
atu3ren
atu4rer
at3w
4atz
atz1er
at2z1in
atzt2
atz3th
a2u
2au.
au1a2
2aub
au2bl
au2bri
4auc
auch4se
auch3ta
au3di
au2dr
2aue
aue2b
aue3re
au5erein
au5erl
aue4s
au3et
au2fa
auf1an
2aufe.
2aufeh
auf1er
au5fer.
3aufn
au2fo
2aug
au3g6e
4augeh
2au1i
au2is
4auj
au2kl
aule2s
aul3ese
aul4s
au3lü
4aum
au2mal
au2mar
au2mau
au2mer
au2m1o
aum3p2
aums2
aum3st
aum3sz
4au3n2
au4nio
aun3k
aun3s
a4unz
au1o
aup2
2au3r2
au2s1ah
ausan8ne.
4au2sc
au3schl
au3schw
2ause
aus3erp
au4s3erw
au2so
au2sp
aus3s4
3aussag
aus4se.
au2st
aus3tri
2aut.
au3tan
au2tä
aut1äu
2aute
au4t3erh
3auto
2auts4
aut5st
2aux
auz2w
2a1ü
2a1v
av4a
ava3t
a2vr
2a1w
awi3e
a1x
ax2a
ax3an
ax2e
2a1ya
a1yeu
ays2
aysi1e
ay3ste
2a1z
az4a
azo3
az2u
ä1a
ä1b
ä2b3l
äb2s
ä1che
äche1e
ä1chi
äch3l
ä2chr
äch2sp
äch4st
ä1chu
ä1ck
ä1d
ä3di
ä4d1ia
ä3do
ä2d3r
2ä3e
äf2fl
äf5l
äf3r
äf2s
äft4s3
ä1g
äge1i
äges4
ä2g3l
ä3g2n
ä2g3r
äg3s2tr
1ä2gy
äh1a
2ä3he
ä3hi
ähl1a
äh5l2e
äh6l3e4be
äh3li
2ähm
äh5ne
äh5ri
2ähs
2äht4
äh3tr
ä3hu
äh1w
ä1im
ä1is.
ä3isch.
ä1isk
ä1j
ä1k
ä2k3l
ä2k3r
ä1la
älbe2
äl2bl
äle3ru
äl2l1a
äl2p3
äl2sc
ä1lu
ä3me
ämi3en
2äml
ämt2e
2än.
än2dr
2ä3ne
äne2n1
än2f3
2änge
än2gl
än2gr
äng3se
2ä3ni
än5k2e
än2k3l
än2kr
änk2s
än5n4e2
2äns
än4s3c
änse3h
ä1on
ä1pa
äp2pr
äp4s3c
äp2st
1äq
ä2r3a2
är4af
är1ä
är1c
4äre
ä2r1ei
äre2n
ä2r3ene
är2gr
ä1ri
är1int
är2k5l
ärk2s
är1o2
ä1rö
ärse2
är6si
är2st
ärt4e
ärt2s3
ä1ru
är3ü
är2z1w
äs2a
äs4e
äse3g
äse3re
äser4ei
äse4ren
äse3r2i
äse3t
äskop2
ä3s2kr
ä2s1p
äs4s3c
äs4s3erk
äs4st
ä4s3t
äs5ti
äs4tr
ä3su
ä1ß
äß1erk
2ät
ä4t3a2
ä3te
äte1i
äte2n
ät2ha
ä1to
ät1ob
ät3r
ät2sä
ät4schl
ät4schr
ät2s1i
äts3l
ät3so
äts1p
ät2st
äts3ti
ät2tr
ä3tu
ät5ze
äu2br
äu1c
äu3el
ä2uf
äuf2e
äug3l
2äul
2äum
äu2ma
äum2s
äums1p
ä2u3n2
2äu5r
2ä3us.
äu2sc
äu6schä
äu4schm
äu5se
ä1usg
ä1usk
ä1usn
äu2sp
äus4s3c
1äuß
äu2tr
4ä1v
1äx
ä1z
â1t
6b.
1ba
2babs
ba3char
bach7t4e
backs4
2b3adr
2baf
3bah
bah2nu
bah5re
bais4
ba2ka
ba2k3er
ba2k1i
bak5l
ba2kra
3bal
ba1la
bal4l3eh
bal6lerg
bal3th
2b1am
ban2a
3b2and
ban2dr
ba3n4e
ba5ner
2bang
ban2k1a
ban4kl
2banl
2b1ans
b3anz
ba2ran
bar3b
b2ard
bar3de
ba2rei
bar2en
bar3zw
3bas
ba5sa
ba2sc
ba4st
ba2to
bau3b
bau3g
bau3s
bau1s2k
ba1yo
3b2ä1c
1bäe
1b2är
1b2äs
1bäu
b1äug
bäu3s
4b1b
b3ba
bben3s2
bbe4p
b3bi
bb5ler
b2bli
bb3lin
b3blo
b3blö
bbru2
bb2s
bbu1
b7by
2b3c
2b5d
bde1st
bdo3
bdu3s
1be.
3be3a
be5an
be4au.
b2ebe
1be1c
be2del
bedi4
be1eh
be1erl
be3eta
3bef
be3g4
2beier
bei1f4
beil2
bei3la
2beime
3b2ein
bei5na
be1ind
be1in4h
bei3sc
beis2e
bei3st
beit2s
3bek
be3las
be3lec
be3lei
be2l1en
be2let
be3li
bel3la
bel3sp
bel3sz
belt4
bel3ta
bel3tr
1bem
1ben.
be3na
be4nal
ben3ar
be4nau
be3ne
ben4erg
be4ners
ben3g
be3ni
ben4se
ben2sp
ben4su
ben4th
3b2enti
b1ents
4bentw
ben1un
ben3z2
be1o
be1ra
ber3am
be2ran
ber3as
berd4
ber3eiw
be3rel
bere4s
ber3esc
ber4in.
ber3iss
ber3na
b1ernt
be1rop
ber3st4a
ber3th
be3rum
1be1s
be3sa
be2s1er
be3slo
be3spo
be3spr
bes5s4e
b3esst.
bes3sz
bes2to2
be4s3tol
be3s4ze
3bet
be2tap
be3tha
be1ur
3b2ew
2b1ex
1bez
2b5f4
bfal2
4b3g4
b5ga
bge3
bge5n
bges4
2b3h
1bi
bi1ak
bibe4
bi2e
bi3ens
bi3ent
bie2s
bi3k2a
bi2ke.
bi2kes
bi3ki
3b2il
bil4a
4b3illu
bi2lu
2b1inb
bi3n2e
2b1inf
2b3int
bi2o3
bi3on
biri1
bi5se
bi2sol
bis4s3c
bi4st
bi2t
b2i3ta
bi3te
bi3to
bi3tr
bit3st
2bi4tu
bi5tum
b2i5tus
biz2
bi3za
4b3j
bjek4to
2b3k4
b2l2
2bl.
bla3b6
4b5lad
b6lanc
6blasser
b6latt
b3law
3b4le2a
b3leb
2b5leg
b3leh
2b3leid
b5lein
blei3sc
ble3l
b4lem
b4ler
b5lese
ble5sz
3b4let
2b3lich
3blick
b4lie
2b3lis
b4lit
3b6litz
1b4lo
b6loc
b5lok
2b3lun
blu4ter
3blü
2b3m
6b3n2
bni2
bnis3
1bo
bo5as
bo2b3l
bo3b4r
bo2c
bo3ch2
bo3d2
bo2e3i
2b3of
bo5fe
bo1is
bo2l1an
3bon.
bon2d1e
bo2ne
3bons
b1op
bo1r2a
bo4rä
bor2d1i
bor2d3r
bo2rei
bor2s
b1ort
bor4tei
bor2t3r
bo2sc
bo5se
bo4s3p
3bot
bote5n4e
bo3th
bot2st
bö2b3
2b3öf
bö3sc
2b3p2
bpa4g
2b3q
b2r4
2br.
b4ra.
2b3rad
b6rah
b6ra3k
bra1st4
2bre.
6b5rechte
2b3ref
2breg
b3reif
b3rek
3brem
2b3rep
b4rer
b4ri
2b5riem
bri2er
2b5rig
b5ris
b5roh
2b3rol
b4ruc
brust1
4b1s
bs3ad
bs1an
b3sand
bs3ar
bsat2
b3sä
b4sär
b3sc
b4schan
b7schl
bs4cu
b3se
b5se.
bs1e2b
b5sel.
bs1ele
bse2n
b5sen.
bs1ent
bs1er
